North Carolina, session 2025, SB170.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 7B-906.1(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) The director of social services shall make a timely request to the clerk to calendar
each hearing at a session of court scheduled for the hearing of juvenile matters. The clerk shall
give 15 days' notice of the hearing and its purpose to (i) the parents, (ii) the juvenile if 12 years
of age or more, (iii) the guardian, (iv) the person providing care for the juvenile, (v) the custodian
or agency with custody, (vi) the guardian ad litem, and (vii) any other person or agency the court
may specify. The department of social services shall either provide to the clerk the name and
address of the person providing care for the juvenile for notice under this subsection or file
written documentation with the clerk that the juvenile's current care provider was sent notice of
hearing. Consistent with this subsection, the department of social services shall provide verbal
notice of upcoming hearings to the person providing care for the juvenile if that person did not
receive notice from the clerk. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to make the person
providing care for the juvenile a party to the proceeding solely based on receiving notice and the
right to be heard."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 7B-906.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d3) At any permanency planning hearing where the court makes a finding under
subdivision (e)(1) of this section that a juvenile be placed with a parent from a family foster care
home, the person providing care for the juvenile shall be, at a minimum, verbally notified at least
48 hours prior to the juvenile returning to the parent and included in the transition planning when
it is determined to be in the best interest of the child."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
*S170-v-1*